apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <pardef n="t/as__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uo</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iems</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uos</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Lietuv/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tas"><i>t</i><par n="t/as__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Lietuva"><i>Lietuv</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Airija"><i>Airij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Albanija"><i>Albanij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Australija"><i>Australij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgarija"><i>Bulgarij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Švedija"><i>Švedij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Suomija"><i>Suomij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čekija"><i>Čekij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenkija"><i>Lenkij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slovakija"><i>Slovakij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lietuvos Respublika"><i>Lietuvos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenkijos Respublika"><i>Lenkijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Airijos Respublika"><i>Airijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čekijos Respublika"><i>Čekijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Europos Sąjunga"><i>Europos<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sovietų Sąjunga"><i>Sovietų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tarybų Sąjunga"><i>Tarybų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tarybų Socialistinių Respublikų Sąjunga"><i>Tarybų<b/>Socialistinių<b/>Respublikų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
